North Carolina, session 2025, SB13.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 15A-101 reads as rewritten:
"§ 15A-101. Definitions.
Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the following words have the listed meanings:
…
*S13-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(6a) Politically Motivated Act of Violence. – Any act that constitutes a criminal
offense under North Carolina law in which the offender intentionally targets,
harms, threatens, or attempts to harm another person, in whole or in part,
because of the victim's real or perceived political beliefs, viewpoints,
affiliations, party membership, advocacy, candidacy for public office, voting
history, participation in lawful political demonstrations, or public expression
on political issues.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 15A-1340.16(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Aggravating Factors. – The following are aggravating factors:
…
(15a) The offense was a politically motivated act of violence as defined in
G.S. 15A-101. The existence of this aggravating factor shall not limit the State
from alleging other aggravating factors under G.S. 15A-1340.16.
…."
SECTION 3. Article 81B of Chapter 15A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 15A-1340.16H. Politically motivated violence sentence enhancement.
(a) If a person is convicted of a felony offense, and the court or trier of fact finds that the
offense was a politically motivated act of violence, then all of the following apply:
(1) The person shall be sentenced at a felony class level one class higher than the
principal felony for which the person was convicted.
(2) The offender shall be ineligible for parole, early release, or any form of
sentencing reduction.
(b) Political motivation may be proven by direct or circumstantial evidence, including
statements, manifestos, affiliations, or targeting patterns.
(c) An indictment or information for the felony shall allege in that indictment or
information the facts that qualify the offense for an enhancement under this section. One pleading
is sufficient for all felonies that are tried at a single trial.
(d) The State shall prove the issues set out in subsection (a) of this section beyond a
reasonable doubt during the same trial in which the defendant is tried for the felony unless the
defendant pleads guilty or no contest to the issues. If the defendant pleads guilty or no contest to
the felony but pleads not guilty to the issues set out in subsection (a) of this section, then a jury
shall be impaneled to determine the issues."
SECTION 4. G.S. 15A-2000(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) Aggravating Circumstances. – Aggravating circumstances that may be considered are
limited to the following:
…
(13) The capital felony was committed against a victim because of the victim's
political beliefs, public political activity, candidacy for office, or affiliation
with a political movement, and the act was committed to silence, intimidate,
or retaliate against political expression."
SECTION 5. G.S. 15A-2004(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) A sentence of death may not be imposed upon a defendant convicted of a capital
felony unless the State has given notice of its intent to seek the death penalty. Notice of intent to
seek the death penalty shall be given to the defendant and filed with the court on or before the
date of the pretrial conference in capital cases required by Rule 24 of the General Rules of
Practice for the Superior and District Courts, or the arraignment, whichever is later. If the State
alleges political motivation under G.S. 15A-2000(e)(13), that aggravating circumstance shall be
included in the notice of intent to seek the death penalty and may be considered during capital
sentencing pursuant to G.S. 15A-2000, even if the defendant pleads guilty. A court may
Page 2 Senate Bill 13-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
discipline or sanction the State for failure to comply with the time requirements in Rule 24, but
shall not declare a case as noncapital as a consequence of such failure. In addition to any
discipline or sanctions the court may impose, the court shall continue the case for a sufficient
time so that the defendant is not prejudiced by any delays in holding the hearing required by Rule
24."
SECTION 6. Article 3A of Chapter 114 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 114-11.7. Special prosecutor and Attorney General notice.
(a) The district attorney shall notify the Attorney General in any case involving a
politically motivated act of violence as defined in G.S. 15A-101.
(b) Upon request of the district attorney, the Attorney General may assign a special
prosecutor to any case involving a politically motivated act of violence as defined in
G.S. 15A-101.
(c) In addition to any rights conferred by the Crime Victims' Rights Act, Article 46 of
Chapter 15A of the General Statutes, the victim, or next of kin, shall be permitted to present an
impact statement during any phase of a criminal proceeding based on a politically motivated act
of violence as defined in G.S. 15A-101."
SECTION 7. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 8. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Senate Bill 13-Third Edition Page 3